src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-a4-adj_pieni_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# Adjectives: pieni, nuori


  Adj - pieni: #  GOLD --  kontrollerad av Elina 
     pieni+A+Sg+Nom: pieni
     pieni+A+Sg+Gen: pienen
     pieni+A+Sg+Par: pientä
     pieni+A+Sg+Ill: [piehneen, pienheen]
     pieni+A+Sg+Ine: pienessä
     pieni+A+Sg+Ela: pienestä
     pieni+A+Sg+All: pienele
     pieni+A+Sg+Ade: pienelä
     pieni+A+Sg+Abl: pieneltä
     pieni+A+Sg+Ess: pienenä
     pieni+A+Sg+Tra: pieneksi
     pieni+A+Pl+Nom: pienet
     pieni+A+Pl+Gen: [pienitten, pienten]
     pieni+A+Pl+Par: pieniä 
     pieni+A+Pl+Ill: [piehniin, pienhiin]
     pieni+A+Pl+Ine: pienissä
     pieni+A+Pl+Ela: pienistä
     pieni+A+Pl+All: pienile
     pieni+A+Pl+Ade: pienilä
     pieni+A+Pl+Abl: pieniltä
     pieni+A+Pl+Ess: pieninä
     pieni+A+Pl+Tra: pieniksi
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: pienempi
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: pienemän
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Par: pienempää
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: pienemphään
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: pienemässä
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: pienemästä
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+All: pienemälle
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Ade: pienemällä
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Abl: pienemältä
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Ess: pienempännä
     pieni+A+Comp+Sg+Tra: pienemäksi
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: pienemät
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [pienemitten, pienempien]
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Par: pienempiä
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: pienemphiin
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: pienemissä
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: pienemistä
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+All: pienemille
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Ade: pienemillä
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Abl: pienemiltä
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Ess: pienempinnä
     pieni+A+Comp+Pl+Tra: pienemiksi
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [pienin, pieniin]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: [pienimän, pieniimän]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Par: [pienimpää, pieniimpää]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: [pienimphään, pieniimphään]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: [pienimässä, pieniimässä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [pienimästä, pieniimästä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+All: [pienimälle, pieniimälle]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Ade: [pienimällä, pieniimällä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Abl: [pienimältä, pieniimältä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Ess: [pienimpännä, pieniimpännä]     
     pieni+A+Superl+Sg+Tra: [pienimäksi, pieniimäksi]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: [pienimät, pieniimät]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [pienimitten, pieniimitten, pieniimpien, pienimpien]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Par: [pienimpiä, pieniimpiä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: [pienimphiin, pieniimphiin]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: [pienimissä, pieniimissä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [pienimistä, pieniimistä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+All: [pienimille, pieniimille]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Ade: [pienimillä, pieniimillä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Abl: [pienimiltä, pieniimiltä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Ess: [pienimpinnä, pieniimpinnä]
     pieni+A+Superl+Pl+Tra: [pienimiksi, pieniimiksi]
       
  Adj - pieni: #  GOLD --  kontrollerad av Elina 
     nuori+A+Sg+Nom: [nuori]
     nuori+A+Sg+Gen: [nuoren]
     nuori+A+Sg+Par: [nuorta]
     nuori+A+Sg+Ill: [nuohreen, nuorheen]
     nuori+A+Sg+Ine: [nuoressa]
     nuori+A+Sg+Ela: [nuoresta]
     nuori+A+Sg+All: [nuorele]
     nuori+A+Sg+Ade: [nuorela]
     nuori+A+Sg+Abl: [nuorelta]
     nuori+A+Sg+Ess: [nuorena]
     nuori+A+Sg+Tra: [nuoreksi]
     nuori+A+Pl+Nom: [nuoret]
     nuori+A+Pl+Gen: [nuorten, nuoritten, nuorien]
     nuori+A+Pl+Par: [nuoria]
     nuori+A+Pl+Ill: [nuohriin, nuorhiin]
     nuori+A+Pl+Ine: [nuorissa]
     nuori+A+Pl+Ela: [nuorista]
     nuori+A+Pl+All: [nuorile]
     nuori+A+Pl+Ade: [nuorila]
     nuori+A+Pl+Abl: [nuorilta]
     nuori+A+Pl+Ess: [nuorina]
     nuori+A+Pl+Tra: [nuoriksi]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nuorempi]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: [nuoreman]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Par: [nuorempaa]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: [nuoremphaan]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: [nuoremassa]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: [nuoremasta]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+All: [nuoremalle]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Ade: [nuoremalla]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Abl: [nuoremalta]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Ess: [nuorempanna]
     nuori+A+Comp+Sg+Tra: [nuoremaksi]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [nuoremat]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [nuoremitten, nuorempien]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Par: [nuorempia]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: [nuoremphiin]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: [nuoremissa]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: [nuoremista]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+All: [nuoremille]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Ade: [nuoremilla]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Abl: [nuoremilta]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Ess: [nuorempinna]
     nuori+A+Comp+Pl+Tra: [nuoremiksi]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [nuorin, nuoriin]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: [nuoriman]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Par: [nuorimpaa]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: [nuorimphaan]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: [nuorimassa]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [nuorimasta]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+All: [nuorimalle]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Ade: [nuorimalla]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Abl: [nuorimalta]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Ess: [nuorimpanna]
     nuori+A+Superl+Sg+Tra: [nuorimaksi]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: [nuorimat]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [nuorimitten, nuorimpien]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Par: [nuorimpia]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: [nuorimphiin]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: [nuorimissa]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [nuorimista]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+All: [nuorimille]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Ade: [nuorimilla]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Abl: [nuorimilta]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Ess: [nuorimpinna]
     nuori+A+Superl+Pl+Tra: [nuorimiksi]
